Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB14.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 315 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "340B covered entity":
1. Means a health care facility that is registered as a covered entity under
42 U.S.C. sec. 256b, as amended; and
2. Includes any pharmacy owned or contracted by a covered health care
facility to dispense covered drugs on behalf of the health care facility;
(b) "340B price" or "340B pricing" means the amount required to be paid to
the manufacturer of a covered drug as established pursuant to 42 U.S.C.
sec. 256b, as amended; and
(c) "Covered drug" has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C. sec. 256b, as
amended.
(2) A manufacturer shall not discriminate, or cause others to discriminate, against a
340B covered entity by refusing or withholding 340B pricing for a covered drug if
the manufacturer offers the same drug at a 340B price in any other state.
Discrimination prohibited under this section also includes but is not limited to
any manufacturer-imposed condition, limitation, or delay on the sale of or
purchase of a covered drug at a 340B price, unless the condition, limitation, or
delay is expressly required under federal or state law.
(3) In addition to any private right of action, any person who believes that a
manufacturer is in violation of subsection (2) of this section may make a
complaint to the Attorney General who may, pursuant to KRS 315.235,
investigate the complaint.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed or interpreted to be less restrictive than,
Page 1 of 2
BR099600.100 - 996 - XXXX 2/13/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 996
or in conflict with, any other federal or state law.
Page 2 of 2
BR099600.100 - 996 - XXXX 2/13/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed